Wisconsin, session 2025, AB424.
do enact as follows:AB424,11Section 1. 710.15 (1) (ad) of the statutes is amended to read:AB424,3,62710.15 (1) (ad) “Community” means a tract of land containing 3 or more plots 3of ground upon which mobile homes or manufactured homes are located in 4exchange for the payment of rent or any other fee pursuant to a lease any plot or 1plots of ground upon which 3 or more mobile homes or manufactured homes that 2are occupied for dwelling or sleeping purposes are located. “Community” does not 3include a farm where the occupants of the mobile homes or manufactured homes 4are the father, mother, son, daughter, brother, or sister of the farm owner or 5operator or where the occupants of the mobile homes or manufactured homes work 6on the farm.AB424,27Section 2. 710.15 (1) (ag) of the statutes is amended to read:AB424,3,118710.15 (1) (ag) “Lease” means a written agreement between an operator and 9a resident or occupant establishing the terms upon which the mobile home or 10manufactured home may be located in the community or the resident or occupant 11may occupy a mobile home or manufactured home in the community.AB424,312Section 3. 710.15 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB424,3,1713710.15 (1) (c) “Occupant” means a person other than a resident who rents a 14mobile home or manufactured home in a community from an operator or who 15occupies, as his or her residence, a mobile home or manufactured home located on a 16plot of ground that is rented in a community from an operator site, together with a 17resident of the mobile home or manufactured home, with the operator’s consent.AB424,418Section 4. 710.15 (1) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB424,3,2219710.15 (1) (d) “Operator” means a person engaged in the business of renting 20plots of ground sites or mobile homes or manufactured homes in a community to 21mobile home or manufactured home owners or residents, occupants, or tenants who 22are not residents or occupants.AB424,523Section 5. 710.15 (1) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:AB424,4,41710.15 (1) (f) “Resident” means a person who rents a mobile home or 2manufactured home site in a community from an operator and who occupies owns 3the mobile home or site as his or her residence manufactured home located on the 4site.AB424,65Section 6. 710.15 (1) (g) of the statutes is created to read:AB424,4,76710.15 (1) (g) “Site” means a plot of ground in a community upon which a 7mobile home or manufactured home is located.AB424,78Section 7. 710.15 (1m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB424,4,149710.15 (1m) Requirement and term of lease. Every agreement for the 10rental of a mobile home site or manufactured home site shall be by lease. Every 11lease shall be for a term of at least one year unless the resident or occupant requests 12a shorter term and the operator agrees to the shorter term, except that if a resident 13or occupant fails to sign and return a lease or lease renewal, the operator may elect 14to hold the resident or occupant on a month-to-month basis.AB424,815Section 8. 710.15 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB424,4,2016710.15 (3) (a) An operator may not deny a resident or occupant the 17opportunity to enter into or renew, and may not include, exclude, or alter any terms 18of, a lease to continue to locate a mobile home or manufactured home in the 19community solely or in any part on the basis of the age of the mobile home or 20manufactured home.AB424,921Section 9. 710.15 (5m) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:AB424,4,2322710.15 (5m) (f) The community owner or operator seeks to retire the 23community or a site permanently from the rental housing market.AB424,101Section 10. 710.15 (5m) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:AB424,5,62710.15 (5m) (g) The community owner or operator is required to discontinue 3use of the community or a site for the purpose rented as a result of action taken 4against the community owner or operator by local or state building or health 5authorities and it is necessary for the premises to be vacated to satisfy the relief 6sought by the action.AB424,117Section 11. 710.15 (5m) (h) of the statutes is amended to read:AB424,5,118710.15 (5m) (h) The physical condition of the mobile home or manufactured 9home presents a threat to the health or safety of its residents or occupants or others 10in the community or, by its physical appearance, disrupts the right to the enjoyment 11and use of the community by others.AB424,1212Section 12. 710.15 (5m) (i) of the statutes is amended to read:AB424,5,1413710.15 (5m) (i) Refusal to sign a lease or to submit a signed lease to the 14operator.AB424,1315Section 13. 710.15 (5m) (j) of the statutes is amended to read:AB424,5,1716710.15 (5m) (j) Material misrepresentation in the application for tenancy or 17failure to meet any nondiscriminatory application criteria.AB424,1418Section 14. 710.15 (5m) (jm) of the statutes is created to read:AB424,5,2019710.15 (5m) (jm) Violation of a community rule prohibiting any resident from 20owning more than one mobile home or manufactured home in the community.AB424,1521Section 15. 710.15 (5r) of the statutes is amended to read:AB424,6,522710.15 (5r) Notice requirements apply. The notice requirements of s. 23704.17 (1p) (a), (2) (a), and (3) apply to a termination of tenancy under sub. (5m) (a), 1and the notice requirements of s. 704.17 (1p) (b), (2) (b), and (3) apply to a 2termination of tenancy under sub. (5m) (b) to (k), except that a community owner or 3operator shall provide at least 90 days’ written notice to all known residents and 4occupants prior to permanently retiring the community or a site from the rental 5housing market.AB424,166Section 16. 710.15 (6) of the statutes is created to read:AB424,6,127710.15 (6) Applicability. This section does not apply to a person who 8occupies, as his or her residence, a mobile home or manufactured home in a 9community if the resident of the mobile home or manufactured home does not also 10occupy the home as his or her residence. A person who is not a resident or occupant 11who rents a mobile home or manufactured home in a community from a resident or 12operator shall be subject to the provisions under ch. 704.AB424,6,1313